District of Columbia statutes.
31-5410

Credits for assessments paid.

(a)

A member insurer may offset against its premium taxes an assessment described in § 31-5406(h) to the extent of 10% of the amount of the assessment for each of the 10 calendar years following the year in which the assessment was paid. In the event a member insurer should cease doing business, all uncredited assessments may be credited against the premium taxes for the year it ceases doing business.

(b)

Any sums which are acquired by refund, pursuant to § 31-5406(f) from the Association by member insurers, and which theretofore have been offset against premium taxes as provided in subsection (a) of this section, shall be paid by member insurers to the District of Columbia in accordance with requirements of the District of Columbia Department of Finance and Revenue. The Association shall notify the Commissioner that the refunds have been made.

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-129, § 11, 39 DCR 4036
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10, 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 31(b), 45 DCR 745
Premium tax liability offsets, see § 31-205.
This section is referenced in § 31-205.
1981 Ed., § 35-1950.
Pursuant to the Office of the Chief Financial Officer’s “Notice of Public Interest” published in the April 18, 1997, issue of the District of Columbia Register ( 44 DCR 2345) the Office of Tax and Revenue assumed all of the duties and functions previously performed by the Department of Finance and Revenue, as set forth in Commissioner’s Order 69-96, dated March 7, 1969. This action was made effective January 22, 1997, nunc pro tunc.